Hawaii, session 2025, HB331.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that although most counties already exempt state agencies from certain permitting requirements, it is essential to ensure that all facilities under the jurisdiction of the department of education, university of Hawaii, and school facilities authority are also granted this exemption.  Eliminating the permitting process for repetitive construction projects for state departments and agencies will also accelerate the timeline for essential repairs and improvements, addressing critical infrastructure needs more efficiently across the State. The purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Establish an exemption from applicable county permit requirements for repetitive construction projects for facilities under the control of any state department or agency; and (2)  Clarify that contracts for the construction, renovation, or repair of facilities under the control of the department of education, university of Hawaii, or school facilities authority shall be exempt from county permitting requirements that related off-site improvements be made by the contracting government agency as a condition to the issuance of any permit. SECTION 2.  Chapter 46, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§46-     County permit exemption; repetitive construction projects.  A contract for repetitive construction projects, including but not limited to one-for-one replacements and minor repair and maintenance, of facilities under the control of any state department or agency shall be exempt from any applicable county permit requirement due to any county agency having jurisdiction over the proposed action; provided that no contract for repetitive construction projects shall be exempt from federal, state, or county floodplain management development standards or statutes, codes, ordinances, rules, or regulations with which compliance is required under the National Flood Insurance Program." SECTION 3.  Section 103-39.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§103-39.5 Construction, renovation, or repair of school facilities; county permit exemption.  Any contract for the construction, renovation, or repair of [public school] facilities under the control of the department of education, university of Hawaii, or school facilities authority shall be exempt from any county requirement [of a county] that related off-site improvements be made by the contracting government agency as a condition to the issuance of any permit." SECTION 4.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________